District of Columbia statutes.
9-813

Disposition of money recovered from pool and fountain.

Money hereafter recovered from the pool and fountain at Dulles International Airport shall not be subject to the Act of June 30, 1949, as amended (40 U.S.C. §§ 484(m) , 485(a) [see now 40 U.S.C. §§ 552 and 571 ]), and may be given to a nonprofit organization which, in the determination of the Administrator of the Federal Aviation Agency, promotes and provides for the welfare of travelers in air commerce.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 646, Pub. L. 88-507, title I, § 101
1973 Ed., § 7-1413.
1981 Ed., § 7-1213.